Hawaii statutes.
§560:5-206 Judicial appointment of
guardian; priority of minor's nominee; limited guardianship. (a) The
court shall appoint as guardian a person whose appointment will be in the best
interest of the minor. The court shall appoint a person nominated by the
minor, if the minor has attained fourteen years of age, unless the court finds
the appointment will be contrary to the best interest of the minor.

(b) In the interest of developing
self-reliance of a ward or for other good cause, the court, at the time of
appointment or later, on its own motion or on motion of the minor ward or other
interested person, may limit the powers of a guardian otherwise granted by this
part and thereby create a limited guardianship, except where a guardian was
appointed subsequent to parental rights terminated under chapter 571 or 587A.
Following the same procedure, the court may grant additional powers or withdraw
powers previously granted. [L 2004, c 161, pt of §1; am L 2010, c 135, §7]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next